Wisconsin, session 2025, SB444.
do enact as follows:SB444,13Section 1. 946.685 of the statutes is created to read:SB444,2,21946.685 Identification of law enforcement officer when detaining or 2arresting. (1) In this section:SB444,2,83(a) “Law enforcement agency” means a governmental unit of one or more 4persons employed full time by the federal government, a state, or a political 5subdivision of a state for the purpose of preventing and detecting crime and 6enforcing federal or state laws or local ordinances, employees of which unit are 7authorized to make arrests for crimes while acting within the scope of their 8authority.SB444,2,149(b) “Law enforcement officer” means any person who is employed by a law 10enforcement agency for the purpose of detecting and preventing crime and 11enforcing laws or ordinances and who is authorized to make arrests for violations of 12the laws or ordinances the person is employed to enforce, whether that enforcement 13authority extends to all laws or ordinances or is limited to specific laws or 14ordinances.SB444,2,1715(2) A law enforcement officer, or a person acting in coordination with a law 16enforcement agency, shall do all of the following when arresting or detaining an 17individual:SB444,2,1918(a) Identify themselves as a law enforcement officer or a person acting in 19coordination with a law enforcement agency.SB444,2,2420(b) Display their surname, badge number, and agency insignia on their 21uniform or badge. The surname and badge number must have a 4.5:1 color contrast 22ratio and the insignia must display the name of the agency that employs or 23supervises the law enforcement officer or person in letters that are at least 1.5 24inches tall and 0.5 inches wide.SB444,3,11(c) Provide the authority for the arrest or detention.SB444,3,82(d) Not cover their faces or use another disguise for the purpose of concealing 3their identity. This paragraph does not apply to medical-grade masks or 4respirators worn to prevent the transmission of airborne diseases or to protect 5against exposure to smoke, gas, or other natural hazards when there is an 6imminent danger of transmission or exposure or to special weapons and tactics 7team officers who wear gear issued by a law enforcement agency to protect their 8faces from physical harm while performing their duties.SB444,3,109(3) A person who violates sub. (2) is guilty of a Class D felony, except that, 10notwithstanding s. 939.50 (3) (d), the court may not impose a term of imprisonment.SB444,3,1111